Hawaii statutes.
§199-3 Conservation and resources
enforcement officers, duties; other law enforcement officers. (a) The
conservation and resources enforcement officers, with respect to all state
lands, including public lands, state parks, forest reserves, forests, aquatic
life and wildlife areas, Kaho‘olawe island reserve, and any other lands and
waters within the State, shall:

(1) Enforce title 12, chapters 6D, 6E, and 6K, and
rules adopted thereunder;

(2) Investigate complaints, gather evidence, conduct
investigations, and conduct field observations and inspections as required or
assigned;

(3) Cooperate with enforcement authorities of the
State, counties, and federal government in development of programs and mutual
aid agreements for conservation and resources enforcement activities within the
State;

(4) Cooperate with established search and rescue
agencies of the counties and the federal government in developing plans and
programs and mutual aid agreements for search and rescue activities within the
State;

(5) Check and verify all leases, permits, and
licenses issued by the department of land and natural resources;

(6) Enforce the laws relating to firearms,
ammunition, and dangerous weapons contained in chapter 134;

(7) Enforce the laws in chapter 291E relating to
operating a vessel on or in the waters of the State while using intoxicants;

(8) Whether through a specifically designated marine
patrol or otherwise, enforce the rules in the areas of boating safety,
conservation, and search and rescue relative to the control and management of
boating facilities owned or controlled by the State, ocean waters, and
navigable streams and any activities thereon or therein, and beaches encumbered
with easements in favor of the public, and the rules regulating vessels and their
use in the waters of the State; and

(9) Carry out other duties and responsibilities as
the board of land and natural resources from time to time may direct.

(b) Every state and county officer charged
with the enforcement of laws and ordinances shall enforce and assist in the
enforcement of title 12, chapters 6E and 6K, and rules adopted thereunder and
in the enforcement of chapters 266 and 267 and of all rules adopted thereunder.
[L 1978, c 171, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 85, §112; am L 1987, c 364, §1; am L
1991, c 272, §5; am L 1996, c 296, §2; am L 1997, c 17, §1; am L 2000, c 189,
§24; am L 2004, c 142, §10]

Note

Chapter 267 referred to in text is repealed.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next